North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 5. North Carolina Appalachian Trails System Act. [Repealed]

§ 113A-72.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.70 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-73.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.72 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-74.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.74 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-75.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.76 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-76.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.78 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015

§ 113A-77.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.80 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(f), effective July 1, 2015.

§§ 113A-78 through 113A-82.

Reserved for future codification purposes.